test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_taho_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - taho: # ML,checked. This noun has variation, especially in plural (tavvoin, tavvoid; see korp). I have tried to keep the system here.
  
    taho+N+Sg+Nom: taho
    taho+N+Sg+Gen: tavo
    taho+N+Sg+Acc: tavo
    taho+N+Sg+Ill: tahon
    taho+N+Sg+Loc: tavvoost
    taho+N+Sg+Com: tavvoin
    taho+N+Sg+Abe: tavottáá
    taho+N+Ess: tahhoon
    taho+N+Par: tahhood
    taho+N+Pl+Nom: tavoh
    taho+N+Pl+Gen: tavoi
    taho+N+Pl+Acc: tavoid
    taho+N+Pl+Ill: tavvoid
    taho+N+Pl+Loc: tavoin
    taho+N+Pl+Com: [tavoiguin, tavoigijn]
    taho+N+Pl+Abe: tavoittáá

  Noun - spaha: # ok
    spaha+N+Sg+Nom: spaha
    spaha+N+Sg+Gen: spava
    spaha+N+Sg+Acc: spava
    spaha+N+Sg+Ill: spahan
    spaha+N+Sg+Loc: spavvaast
    spaha+N+Sg+Com: spavvain
    spaha+N+Sg+Abe: spavattáá
    spaha+N+Ess: spahhaan
    spaha+N+Par: spahhaad
    spaha+N+Pl+Nom: spavah
    spaha+N+Pl+Gen: spavai
    spaha+N+Pl+Acc: spavaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Ill: spavvaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Loc: spavain
    spaha+N+Pl+Com: [spavaiguin, spavaigijn]
    spaha+N+Pl+Abe: spavaittáá
